Hawaii statutes.
[§353-37] Terms and conditions of
release; violations; sanctions. [Section repealed July 1, 2020. L
2016, c 217, §8.] (a) A misdemeanant released pursuant to section 353-36
shall be subject to the conditions stated in section 804-7.4. In addition, the
director may impose any of the conditions that a court is authorized to impose
pursuant to section 804-7.1 and shall impose any conditions contained in any
court order superseded by the director's order.

(b) Intentional violations of the conditions
of release shall be disposed of as provided in sections 804-7.2 and 804‑7.3.
[L 2016, c 217, pt of §1]

Note

Section applies only to persons charged with offenses subject
to sentencing in §706-663, on or after July 1, 2016. L 2016, c 217, §4.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next